Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Condemnation of Property

38-6-101.
Power of towns and cities.

Whenever, in a town, city, or city and county, the council thereof or other municipal board having authority by charter or statute passes a resolution or ordinance to establish, construct, extend, open, widen, or alter any street, lane, avenue, boulevard, park, playground, parkway, pleasure way, public square, market, viaduct, bridge, sewer, tunnel, or subway or to build, acquire, construct, or establish any public building or any other public work or public improvement, said town, city, or city and county shall have the right to take, damage, condemn, or appropriate by right of eminent domain such private property as may be required in the manner provided for in this part 1; but, except as specifically authorized by law, no incorporated town shall exercise the power of eminent domain over property outside the town boundaries. In any case where such special benefits are not to be assessed by commissioners as provided in section 38-6-107 against the real estate specially benefited, the said town, city, or city and county may follow the procedure set forth in this part 1 or the procedure set forth in article 1 of this title.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 373, § 1.

C.L.

§ 9076.

CSA:

C. 163, § 119.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-1.

L. 57:

P. 365, § 1.

L. 59:

P. 423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-1.

L. 69:

P. 356, § 1.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 312, § 60, effective May 20.

38-6-102.
Petition.

The attorney for said city or city and county, in the name of such city or city and county, shall apply to the district court of the district in which said city or city and county is situated, by petition, which petition shall state the general nature of the improvement proposed to be established or made, a correct description of the property required, and the name of the owner of said property as shown on the records of the county clerk and recorder of the county or city and county in which said property is situated. Said petition shall pray for the appointment of three disinterested commissioners, freeholders of real estate in and residents of said city or city and county, to appraise and award the damages which said owner may sustain by reason of the appropriation and condemnation of such property by the city or city and county and to perform such other duties as are in this part 1 enumerated.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 374, § 2.

C.L.

§ 9077.

CSA:

C. 163, § 120.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-2.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 312, § 61, effective May 20.

38-6-103.
Defendants - guardian ad litem.

The owners of all property sought to be condemned for the proposed improvement shall be made parties defendant. It shall not be necessary to make any person a defendant unless such person has some title thereto of record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county or city and county in which said property is situated. If the proceeding seeks to affect land owned by an infant or a mentally incompetent person, the legal guardian or conservator of such person shall be made a party defendant. If such person has no legal guardian, the district court shall have the power to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent such person.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 374, § 3.

C.L.

§ 9078.

CSA:

C. 163, § 121.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-3.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 932, § 53, effective July 1.

38-6-104.
Judge to set hearing - summons - service - publication.

Upon the filing of the petition, said court shall fix a date for hearing said petition, and the attorney for the petitioner shall prepare and issue a summons, directed to the defendants, notifying them of the date fixed by the court for the hearing. Jurisdiction of said defendants shall be obtained by causing the summons to be served on the defendants in like manner as is provided by the laws of this state for the service of summons in civil actions, except as otherwise provided in this section. The date for the hearing of the petition shall not be less than ten days after the date of the service of the summons. In case any defendant does not reside in said city or city and county or is a foreign corporation or in case the attorney for the petitioner files an affidavit that he has endeavored to find such person in such city or city and county, for the purpose of causing the person to be served, and that after reasonable effort he has been unable to find said person in said city or city and county, the petitioner may cause the summons to be published for three consecutive times in any daily or weekly newspaper published in said city or city and county. The date for the hearing of said petition shall not be less than ten days after the date of the last publication of said summons.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 374, § 4.

C.L.

§ 9079.

CSA:

C. 163, § 122.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-4.

38-6-105.
Answer - hearing - commissioners.

Any defendant has the right to appear in the proceeding and file an answer, in writing, with the clerk of the court, at any time prior to the date fixed for the hearing of the petition but not thereafter, in which answer said defendant shall set forth such legal objections as he may have to the condemnation or appropriation of any property owned by him or to the prosecution of said proceeding. At the time set for the hearing of said petition or such time to which the hearing may have been continued by the court, the court shall proceed to hear any objections raised by the answer, if any there be. The court has no power to inquire into the necessity of exercising the power of eminent domain for the purpose proposed, nor into the necessity of making the proposed improvement, nor into the necessity of taking the particular property described in the petition. If the court finds that the petitioner has the right to prosecute said proceeding and such objections as may have been filed are overruled, the court shall appoint three disinterested commissioners in condemnation, freeholders of real estate in said city or city and county and residents thereof, who shall have the powers and duties provided in this part 1. No person shall be disqualified to act as a commissioner by reason of the fact that he may own either the fee or other interest in or to property that might be assessed a special benefit on account of the proposed improvement.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 375, § 5.

C.L.

§ 9080.

CSA:

C. 163, § 123.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-5.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 312, § 62, effective May 20.

38-6-106.
Commissioners - oaths - hearing.

The commissioners, before entering upon the duties of their office, shall take an oath to faithfully, promptly, and impartially discharge their duties as such commissioners. Any commissioner may administer oaths to witnesses produced before him. The commissioners may issue subpoenas and compel witnesses to attend and testify, may adjourn and hold meetings, and shall hear such proofs as may be presented to them.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 375, § 6.

C.L.

§ 9081.

CSA:

C. 163, § 124.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-6.

38-6-107.
Assessment of damages - lien - fund.

It is the duty of the commissioners to estimate, fix, and determine the fair and actual cash market value of all property proposed to be taken for the improvement, without reference to the projected improvement, and the fair, direct, and actual damage caused on account of said improvement to other property not taken for the improvement. The commissioners shall provide for the payment of the total amount of their awards for land taken and damaged, in all cases where the resolution or ordinance authorizing the improvement so provides, by assessing against the owners of all real estate which, in their opinion, will be specially benefited by the proposed improvement the amounts of said benefit as special assessments, and such commissioners shall assess the balance required to make said total amount as a general assessment against the petitioning city or city and county. Such special benefits shall be assessed against the owners of each lot or parcel of property that is, in the opinion of said commissioners, specially benefited by said improvement, which said special benefits shall be a lien on the property so charged, and shall be collected as provided by the charter or ordinance of said city or city and county, and when so collected shall be paid into the treasury of said city or city and county as a separate fund, to be used for the payment of the awards and damages.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 376, § 7.

C.L.

§ 9082.

CSA:

C. 163, § 125.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-7.

38-6-108.
Commissioners’ report.

The commissioners shall make, subscribe, and file with the clerk of the court in which such proceedings are had a report of their awards and assessments, in which all property assessed shall be described with convenient certainty and accuracy. In said report, the awards and damages allowed to each owner and the benefits assessed against each parcel of land shall be separately stated.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 376, § 8.

C.L.

§ 9083.

CSA:

C. 163, § 126.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-8.

38-6-109.
Cost assessed against block.

In all cases where the proposed improvement is the opening, widening, establishing, or extension of a public alley, the cost thereof shall be assessed against the property in the particular block in which said alley is situated, according to the benefits to be received therefrom, and against none other.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 376, § 9.

C.L.

§ 9084.

CSA:

C. 163, § 127.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-9.

38-6-110.
Property need not be in city limits.

In all proceedings under this part 1, the petitioner has the right to take or condemn separate parcels of land. Such parcels of land need not be adjoining or contiguous to each other. In all cases where a proceeding is brought to condemn, appropriate, or acquire land for boulevard, parkway, or park purposes, such land or any part thereof may be situated beyond or without the corporate limits of said city or city and county, subject to the limitation imposed by section 31-25-201 (1), C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 377, § 10.

C.L.

§ 9085.

CSA:

C. 163, § 128.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-10.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 313, § 63, effective May 20.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1266, § 4, effective July 1.

38-6-111.
Hearing - notice - publication.

After the report of said commissioners is filed with the clerk of the court, the court shall fix a time for the consideration of said report, and the petitioner shall give written notice to the defendants and all other persons who are the owners of record of property mentioned in said report, whether damaged, appropriated, condemned, or assessed special benefits, of the matters contained in said report and of the time so fixed by the court for the consideration thereof. The notice shall be served in like manner as is provided by the laws of this state for the service of summons in civil actions, except as otherwise provided in this section. Said persons shall be served at least ten days before the time fixed for the consideration of the report by the court. In case any defendant or owner of record of any property damaged, appropriated, condemned, or assessed special benefits does not reside in said city or city and county or is a foreign corporation or in case the attorney for said petitioner files an affidavit that he has endeavored to find such person in said city or city and county, for the purpose of causing said person to be notified, and that after reasonable effort he has been unable to find said person in said city or city and county, the petitioner may cause to be published a notice, of the matters affecting such person contained in said report and of the time fixed for the consideration thereof, for three successive times in some daily or weekly newspaper published in said city or city and county. Said publication shall be in lieu of personal service of said notice on all such persons.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 377, § 11.

C.L.

§ 9086.

CSA:

C. 163, § 129.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-11.

38-6-112.
Objections - default - burden of proof - findings - reappraisement.

Any person who is the owner of, or who has any interest in, any of the property mentioned in said report, whether appropriated or damaged or against which special benefits have been assessed, may appear, at or before the time fixed by the court for the consideration of said report but not after said time, and file his written objection to said report. Default shall be entered against the owners of all property mentioned in said report who have not filed objections thereto within said time, and the report shall be confirmed by the court as to such persons. At the time fixed by the court for the consideration of said report, the court shall proceed to hear any objections that have been filed, except where a jury trial has been demanded, as provided for in section 38-6-113. Any party interested in said proceeding may introduce such evidence as may tend to establish the right of the matter. The burden of proof to change any finding, award, or assessment of said commissioners shall be upon the person objecting thereto. If it appears to the court that the property of the objector has been appraised by the commissioners at more or less than the fair, actual cash market value thereof, or that the fair, direct, and actual damage to property not taken is greater or less than the amount awarded by the commissioners, or that the property of the objector is assessed a special benefit in an amount greater than it will be actually benefited by the proposed improvement, the court shall so find and shall also find what the proper award or assessment shall be, and judgment shall be rendered accordingly. The court, for good cause shown, may modify, alter, change, annul, or confirm the report of the commissioners, or any part thereof, or may order a new appraisement and assessment as to any of the property affected in the proceeding by the same commissioners or by other commissioners appointed by the court.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 378, § 12.

C.L.

§ 9087.

CSA:

C. 163, § 130.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-12.

38-6-113.
Jury trial - motion for new trial - appellate proceedings.

At the time fixed for the hearing of the commissioners’ report or at any time prior thereto but not after said time, any defendant who owns or is interested in any property actually taken, appropriated, or damaged on account of the proposed improvement and who is dissatisfied with the amount awarded to him by said commissioners may file his demand, in writing, for a trial by a jury of either six or twelve freeholders to appraise and assess the damages which said defendant or person may sustain by reason of the appropriation and condemnation of, or damage to, his property. Any person so demanding a jury, at the time of said demand, shall deposit with the clerk the jury fees for one day’s services according to the rate allowed jurors in the district court. The court shall fix an early date for said trial, and on such date the defendants who have made written demands for jury trial within the time provided shall proceed to submit their claims to the jury. Such jury shall be drawn as in civil actions; except that the jurors shall have the qualifications provided in this section.

The court shall proceed in the same manner and with like powers as in other cases, except as otherwise provided in this part 1. At the request of any party to the proceedings, the court shall order that the jury go upon the premises sought to be taken or damaged, in charge of a sworn bailiff and in the company of any other person that the court may order, and examine the premises in person. At the conclusion of the evidence, the matters in controversy may be argued by counsel to the jury, and at the conclusion of the arguments the court shall instruct the jury in writing. The jury shall return a special verdict fixing and determining the damages or compensation to be allowed to each defendant, severally, who has demanded a jury trial, which verdict shall include both the fair, actual cash market value of the land actually taken for the improvement and the direct, fair, and actual damage, if any, caused on account of said improvement to property not taken for the improvement. Any party to the proceeding may move for a new trial in the same manner as in actions at law. The refusal of said court to grant the same may be excepted to and assigned for appeal, but no appeal shall be permitted to stay the improvement sought by the proceeding.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 378, § 13.

C.L.

§ 9088.

CSA:

C. 163, § 131.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-13.

L. 76:

(2) amended, p. 313, § 64, effective May 20.

38-6-114.
Costs - compensation.

The cost of the proceedings shall be paid by the city or city and county. The commissioners shall be allowed a reasonable compensation for their services and expenses, the amount of which shall be fixed by the court.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 379, § 14.

C.L.

§ 9089.

CSA:

C. 163, § 132.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-14.

38-6-115.
Amendments - new parties - notice.

Amendment to the petition or to any paper or record in the proceedings shall be permitted by the court whenever necessary to a fair hearing and final determination of the questions involved. Should it become necessary at any stage of the proceedings to bring in a new party, the court has the power to make such rule or order in relation thereto as may be deemed reasonable and proper. The court also has the power to make all necessary rules and orders for notice to persons of the pendency of the proceedings.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 380, § 15.

C.L.

§ 9090.

CSA:

C. 163, § 133.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-15.

38-6-116.
Decree - copy to city clerk - payments - collection of assessments.

After the trial hearings and determination of all objections to said report, the court shall make its judgment and decree, granting the petitioner such title to the property condemned as may be petitioned for and the right to enter upon the same, upon payment of the compensation ascertained. The decree shall describe each parcel of property so condemned and state the owner thereof and shall describe the property against which special assessments have been made and the amounts thereof. When said judgment and decree have been made by the court, the clerk of said court shall make a certified copy thereof and after thirty days deliver the same to the clerk of the city or city and county. Unless other provision is made in the charter of said city or city and county for the payment of said awards, the council, within ninety days after the date of said decree, shall make, by ordinance, the necessary appropriation for the payment of the compensation for the property condemned. The proper officers of said city or city and county shall thereupon issue the warrants of said city or city and county to the respective parties entitled thereto. The council, by ordinance, shall also provide for the collection of such special assessments as have been confirmed by the final decree of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 380, § 16.

C.L.

§ 9091.

CSA:

C. 163, § 134.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-16.

38-6-117.
City may dismiss proceedings.

The attorney for the city or city and county commencing the proceedings has the right to withdraw said proceedings or to dismiss the same as to one or more of said defendants or as to one or more parcels of land, without prejudice, at any stage of the proceedings, and the petitioner shall pay the costs thereof.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 380, § 17.

C.L.

§ 9092.

CSA:

C. 163, § 135.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-17.

38-6-118.
Ownership in controversy - award.

If the ownership of any property condemned or damaged is in controversy, the amount awarded in payment of said property or the damage thereto shall be paid into the registry of said court for the use of the successful claimants of said property as their respective interests appear to the court. All disputes as to ownership of property taken or damaged shall be tried to the court.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 381, § 18.

C.L.

§ 9093.

CSA:

C. 163, § 136.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-18.

38-6-119.
Possession - award paid.

As soon as the amounts awarded for property taken or in payment of damages have been tendered to the parties entitled thereto, respectively, or deposited in the registry of said court for the use of the respective persons entitled to said amounts, the city or city and county may have possession of said premises and may proceed with the proposed improvement. When any controversy concerning ownership has been determined, the clerk of said court shall pay the amounts awarded to said parties.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 381, § 19.

C.L.

§ 9094.

CSA:

C. 163, § 137.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-19.

38-6-120.
Review - deposit - possession.

Upon the final determination of any proceeding under this part 1, appeal shall lie in every case to bring into review the proceedings therein. If the owner of any property taken or affected appeals, the petitioner may pay into the registry of said court the amount of compensation awarded therefor, for the use of said owner, and shall thereupon be entitled to take possession of and use the property taken or affected the same as if no appeal had been taken. The money so deposited shall remain on deposit until the appeal has been heard and determined. If any owner elects to receive such amount before the determination of such appeal, said appeal shall thereupon be dismissed so far as such owner is concerned.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 381, § 20.

C.L.

§ 9095.

CSA:

C. 163, § 138.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-20.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 313, § 65, effective May 20.

38-6-121.
Lis pendens.

In any proceeding brought under this part 1, the petitioner, at the time of filing the petition or at any time thereafter during the pendency of such proceeding, may file with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the property sought to be condemned is situated a notice of the pendency of the proceeding, containing a general description of the property affected. The filing of such notice shall be constructive notice of the proceeding to any purchaser or encumbrancer of said property. The petitioner shall take all property condemned under this part 1 free of all conveyances, taxes, or assessments that have attached thereto subsequent to the filing of the lis pendens.

History.

Source:
L. 11:

P. 382, § 21.

C.L.

§ 9096.

CSA:

C. 163, § 139.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-21.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 314, § 66, effective May 20.

38-6-122.
Eminent domain beyond city limits.

Cities and towns are granted the power of eminent domain both within and beyond their corporate limits, for the purpose of constructing or installing storm or sanitary sewers, septic tanks, disposal works, or electric lines, regulator stations, substations, and related facilities, such power to be exercised in the manner prescribed by law. Nothing in this section shall authorize the pollution or contamination of any public river, stream, or water.

History.

Source:
L. 21:

P. 773, § 1.

C.L.

§ 9097.

CSA:

C. 163, § 140.

CRS 53:

§ 50-6-22.

L. 63:

P. 482, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-6-22.